Hawaii statutes.
§656-3 Representation of another's credit,
etc., when actionable. No action shall be brought and maintained, to
charge any person upon, or by reason of, any representation or assurance, made
concerning the character, conduct, credit, ability, trade, or dealings of
another person, unless such representation or assurance is made in writing, and
signed by the party to be charged thereby, or by some person, thereunto by the
party lawfully authorized. [CC 1859, §1055; RL 1925, §2667; RL 1935, §3902; RL
1945, §8723; RL 1955, §190-3; HRS §656-3; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Where an action for actual fraud will lie, this section will
not bar the action. 60 H. 225, 587 P.2d 1234 (1978).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next